Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2105
Electrical Division Fund; created; how funded; board; expenses.

There is hereby created the Electrical Division Fund. All money received under the State Electrical Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties pursuant to sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 to be paid out of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund and the Cash Reserve Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Laws 1975, LB 525, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-576;

Laws 1993, LB 193, § 5;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 84;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 127;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 208.
April 8, 2026